Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1035
Nail technology, defined.

Nail technology means (1) attaching, applying, fitting, shaping, or adjusting artificial nails using acrylic, resin, fabric, or gel application systems, (2) sanitizing of the nail bed by brushing on or spraying material in preparation for attaching, fitting, shaping, or adjusting artificial nails using acrylic, resin, fabric, or gel application systems, (3) cutting, filing, buffing, shaping, trimming, polishing, coloring, tinting, cleansing, reshaping, or other cosmetic acts on the nails of a person when done in conjunction with the activities described in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section, (4) the ability to detect infection, fungus, or nail disorders that contraindicate the application of artificial nails, and (5) cleansing, stimulating, manipulating, exercising, or similar acts on the hands or feet of any person when done in conjunction with the activities described in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section. Nail technology does not include cutting nail beds, corns, or calluses or medical treatment involving the feet, hands, or nails.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-361.02;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 297.